Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Information Technology

11.501.
Renumbered as KRS 42.720.

11.503.
Renumbered as KRS 42.722.

11.505.
Renumbered as KRS 42.724.

11.507.
Renumbered as KRS 42.726.

11.509.
Renumbered as KRS 42.728.

11.511.
Renumbered as KRS 42.730.

11.512.
Office of the 911 Coordinator — Duties. [Repealed.]

11.513.
Renumbered as KRS 42.732.

11.515.
Renumbered as KRS 42.740.

11.5161.
Renumbered as KRS 42.734.

11.5162.
Renumbered as KRS 42.736.

11.5163.
Renumbered as KRS 42.738.

11.517.
Renumbered as KRS 42.742.

11.518.
Renumbered as KRS 42.744.

11.520.
Renumbered as KRS 42.746.

11.550.
Telehealth Board — Members — Chair — Scope of administrative regulations — Board to make recommendations following consultation with Governor’s office — Universities of Kentucky and Louisville to report to General Assembly — Receipt and dispensing of funds. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]